Maryland, session 2026, SB0698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1135.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EXPOSED VEHICLE SURFACE” INCLUDES FOR A
VEHICLE:
(1) THE HOOD;
(2) THE TRUNK;
(3) THE WINDSHIELD;
(4) EACH WINDOW;
(5) THE ROOF;
(6) THE CAB OF A COMMERCIAL OR NONCOMMERCIAL TRUCK; AND
(7) THE TOP OF:
– 1 –

Ch. 667 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A TRAILER OR SEMITRAILER BEING TOWED BY A MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
(II) A COMMERCIAL TRAILER OR SEMITRAILER.
(B) (1) (I) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE OR TOW A VEHICLE WITHOUT REMOVING
MAKING REASONABLE EFFORTS TO REMOVE FROM EXPOSED VEHICLE SURFACES,
BEFORE OPERATION OR TOWING, ACCUMULATED SNOW AND ICE THAT POSES A
THREAT TO PERSONS OR PROPERTY.
(II) THE PROHIBITION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY IF COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROHIBITION WOULD:
1. CAUSE THE OPERATOR OF THE VEHICLE TO VIOLATE
ANY LAW OR REGULATION REGARDING WORKPLACE SAFETY; OR
2. THREATEN THE HEALTH OR SAFETY OF THE
OPERATOR OF THE VEHICLE.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A
POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(3) (I) A PERSON WHO IS CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WHILE OPERATING OR TOWING A
NONCOMMERCIAL VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO:
1. FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE OF $25;
2. FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, A FINE OF $50;
3. FOR A THIRD OFFENSE, A FINE OF $100; AND
4. FOR A FOURTH OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE OF
$200.
(II) A PERSON WHO IS CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WHILE OPERATING OR TOWING A
COMMERCIAL VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 667
1. FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE OF $75;
2. FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, A FINE OF $150;
3. FOR A THIRD OFFENSE, A FINE OF $300;
4. FOR A FOURTH OFFENSE, A FINE OF $600; AND
5. FOR A FIFTH OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE OF
$1,000.
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, EACH DAY THAT A VIOLATION OCCURS OR CONTINUES IS A
SEPARATE VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
2. A PERSON MAY NOT BE FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MORE THAN ONCE IN ANY 24–HOUR PERIOD.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B)(1)
OF THIS SECTION THAT CONTRIBUTES TO AN ACCIDENT THAT RESULTS IN
PROPERTY DAMAGE OR THE DEATH OF OR, AS DEFINED IN § 20–102 OF THIS
ARTICLE, SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(2) A PERSON WHO IS CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A VIOLATION THAT OCCURRED WHILE OPERATING OR
TOWING A NONCOMMERCIAL VEHICLE, A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN $200 AND NOT
MORE THAN $1,000; OR
(II) FOR A VIOLATION THAT OCCURRED WHILE OPERATING OR
TOWING A COMMERCIAL VEHICLE, A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN $500 AND NOT MORE
THAN $1,500.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –